Utah statutes.
17-27a-704.   Time to appeal.
(1)  The county shall enact an ordinance establishing a reasonable time of not
less than ten days to appeal to an appeal authority a written decision issued
by a land use authority.
(2)  In the absence of an ordinance establishing a reasonable time to appeal,
an adversely affected party shall have ten calendar days to appeal to an
appeal authority a written decision issued by a land use authority.
